de: Kantenverarbeitung: Durchbrucharbeit; Mit Fransen; Saumstich; Spitzenbesatz; Nahtlos; Verrohrt; Gerollt; Gekräuselt; Serger; Sonstiges
zh-TW: 收邊處理: 挖花; 流蘇; 抽絲; 蕾絲飾邊; 無需縫紉; 滾邊; 滾邊; 扇形; 鎖邊; 其他
ko: 가장자리 마감: 컷워크; 프린지; 헴스티치; 레이스 트림; 무봉제; 파이프; 롤드; 스캘럽; 오버록; 기타
it: Finitura del bordo: Traforata; Con frange; Orlo a giorno; Bordo in pizzo; Senza cuciture; Con bordino a contrasto; Arrotolato; Bordato a smerlo; Ribattuto; Altro
ro-RO: Finisajul marginii: Broderie decupată; Cu ciucuri; Cusut la margine; Cu dantelă; Fără cusătură; Cu vipușcă; Rulat; Festonat; Suprafilat; Altele
sv: Kantfinish: Skärarbete; Fransad; Fållsömnad; Spetskant; Sömlös; Rörledning; Rullad; Uddig; Langetterad; Övrigt
zh-CN: 边缘处理: 镂空; 流苏; 抽纱; 蕾丝边; 免缝; 包边; 卷边; 波浪边; 锁边; 其他
sl-SI: Robna obdelava: Izrezovanje; Z resicami; Z robom; Obroba s čipko; Brez šivanja; Cevni; Valjano; Zobčasto; Serged; Druga
vi: Hoàn thiện cạnh: Kỹ thuật thêu cắt; Chân may tua; Khâu rút chỉ; Trang trí ren; Không cần may; Hình ống; Cuốn biên; Hình vỏ sò; Vắt sổ; Khác
cs: Zakončení okrajů: Ažurová výšivka; Třásně; Ozdobný lem; Krajkový lem; Bez obšití; Obrubování; Obroubení; Vroubkování; Obnitkovací steh; Jiné
pl: Wykończenie krawędzi: Ażurowe wykończenie; Z frędzlami; Wykończenie mereżkowe; Koronkowe wykończenie; Bez szycia; Z lamówką; Wykończenie rolowane; Falowane; Wykończenie overlock; Pozostałe
da: Kantfinish: Udskæring; Frynset; Hulsøm; Udsmykning med blonder; Uden syning; Rør; Valset; Takket; Serged; Andet
el: Φινίρισμα άκρης: Διάτρητο (κοπτό σχέδιο); Με κρόσσια; Με ραφή αζούρ; Με δαντέλα; Χωρίς ραφή; Με ρέλι; Γυρισμένο (ρελιαστό); Με κυματιστό τελείωμα; Ραφή overlock; Άλλο
tr: Kenar bitişi: Ajur işlemeli; Püsküllü; Kenar dikişli; Dantel süsler; Dikişsiz; Biyeli; Kıvrımlı kenar; Tırtıklı; Kenarları dikişli; Diğer
th: การตกแต่งขอบ: ตกแต่งขอบแบบฉลุ; แบบตะเข็บ; เย็บเก็บขอบผ้า; สายลูกไม้; เก็บขอบผ้าโดยไม่เย็บ; แบบท่อ; เก็บขอบผ้าแบบม้วน; แบบหยัก; เย็บโพ้งเก็บขอบผ้า; อื่นๆ
es: Acabado de los bordes: Calado; Con flecos; Vainica; Recorte de puntilla; Sin costura; Entubado; Arrollado; Festoneado; Costuras remalladas; Otros
fr: Finition des bords: Découpe ajourée; À franges; Ourlet ajouré; Galon en dentelle; Sans couture; Passepoilé; Roulé; Festonné; Surjet; Autre
lt-LT: Krašto apdaila: Kirpiniai; Su kutais; Apsiūta; Nėriniuota apdaila; Be siuvimo; Su apvadu; Valcuotas; Banguota; Sergedas; Kita
hr-HR: Završna obrada ruba: Rezbareno; Ukrašeno; Porubljeno; Čipkasti ukras; Bez šivanja; Cjevasto; Zavijeno; Valovito; Strojno obrubljeno; Ostalo
en: Edge finish: Cutwork; Fringed; Hemstitched; Lace trim; No-sew; Piped; Rolled; Scalloped; Serged; Other
hu: Élkezelés: Lyukacsos; Szegélyezett; Szegélyezett; Csipkézett; Varrásmentes; Peremes; Hengerelt; Cakkozott; Tűzött; Egyéb
nb: Kantfinish: Utskjæring; Frynsete; Kantsydd; Blondekant; Syfri; Rør; Rullet; Kamskjell; Overlocket; Annet
fi: Reunan viimeistely: Leikattu; Hapsut; Helmaommeltu; Pitsikoristelu; Ei ompelua; Kanttinauhareunus; Käännetty; Piparkakkureunus; Saumattu; Muu
nl: Randafwerking: Uitgesneden; Geborsteld; Zoomstiksel; Kanten biezen; Naailoos; Afgebiesd; Opgerold; Gekarteld; Overlock; Overig
ja: エッジの仕上げ: カットワーク; フリンジ; ヘムステッチ; レーストリム; 縫わない; パイピング; ロール; スキャロップ; かがり縫い; その他
sk-SK: Povrchová úprava hrán: Vystrihovaný; S lemom; Lemovaný; Čipkovaný lem; Bez šitia; Rúrková; Zahnutý; Hrebenatka; Obšitý; Iné
pt-BR: Acabamento da borda: Recorte; Franjado; Bainha costurada; Ornamento com laço; Sem costura; Acabamento em debrum; Enrolado; Festonado; Costura com acabamento em overloque; Outro
bg-BG: Обработка на ръба: Рязана декорация; Ресни; Декоративен шев; Дантелен ширит; Безшевно; С кант; Завито; С вълнообразен ръб; Оверлог; Друго
pt-PT: Acabamento do caminho de mesa: Recorte; Com franjas; Bainha costurada; Acabamento em renda; Sem costura; Com debrum; Enrolado; Recortado; Costura com acabamento em overlock; Outro
ru: Отделка кромок: Ажурная работа; Бахрома; Вышивка по краю; Кружевная тесьма; Без шитья; Кант; Свернуто; Фестоны; Обработано оверлоком; Другое